lt-LT: Membranos pusė: Mušamoji (muštuko) pusė; Bet kuri / universali; Rezonansinė (priekinė) pusė; Kita
el: Πλευρά μεμβράνης: Πλευρά κρούσης; Οποιαδήποτε/Γενικής χρήσης; Πλευρά αντήχησης (μπροστινή); Άλλο
sl-SI: Stran opne: Udarna stran; Katera koli/univerzalno; Resonančna (sprednja) stran; Drugo
tr: Baş tarafı: Vurma (çırpıcı) tarafı; Her ikisi/Evrensel; Rezonans (ön) tarafı; Diğer
ro-RO: Partea capului: Partea de lovire (bătaie); Oricare/universal; Partea rezonantă (față); Altele
fi: Pään puoli: Lyöntipuoli; Jompikumpi/yleinen; Resonanssipuoli (etu); Muu
es: Lado de la cabeza: Lado batidor (percusión); Cualquiera/Universal; Lado resonante (frontal); Otro
sk-SK: Strana hlavy: Úderová strana; Obe/univerzálne; Rezonančná (predná) strana; Iné
pt-PT: Lado da cabeça: Batedeira; Qualquer/universal; Ressonante (frontal); Outro
bg-BG: Страна на главата: Ударна страна; Която и да е/универсална; Резонираща (предна) страна; Друго
zh-TW: 鼓皮面向: 打擊面; 皆可/通用; 共鳴 (正面); 其他
cs: Hlavová strana: Úderová strana; Obě/univerzální; Rezonanční (přední) strana; Jiné
hr-HR: Strana glave: Udarna strana; Bilo koja / univerzalna; Rezonantna (prednja) strana; Ostalo
it: Lato della testa: Lato battente; Entrambi/universale; Lato risonante (anteriore); Altro
da: Hovedside: Slagside (batter); Begge/universel; Resonansside (front); Andet
nl: Velzijde: Slagkant; Beide/universeel; Resonanskant (voorkant); Overig
vi: Mặt đầu: Mặt gõ (mặt đánh); Bất kỳ/Đa năng; Mặt cộng hưởng (mặt trước); Khác
ko: 헤드 사이드: 배터(비터) 측; 양방향/범용; 공명(전면) 측; 기타
de: Fellseite: Schlagseite; Beidseitig/Universell; Resonanzseite (vorne); Sonstige
pl: Strona membrany: Uderzana (górna); Dowolna/Uniwersalna; Rezonansowa (dolna/przednia); Inna
zh-CN: 头部朝向: 打击面（鼓槌侧）; 任意侧/通用; 共鸣面（前侧）; 其他
fr: Côté de la peau: Côté frappe (batte); L’un ou l’autre/Universel; Côté résonance (avant); Autre
ru: Сторона мембраны: Ударная сторона; Любая/универсальная; Резонаторная (передняя) сторона; Другое
nb: Hodesiden: Slagside; Enten / universell; Resonansside (front); Annet
hu: Fejoldal: Ütőbőr oldal; Bármelyik / univerzális; Rezonáns (front) oldal; Egyéb
sv: Sida av trumskinn: Slagsida; Valfri/universell; Resonanssida (fram); Övrigt
pt-BR: Lado da pele: Lado da batida (batedor); Qualquer/Universal; Lado ressonante (frontal); Outro
ja: 頭部サイド: 打面 (ビーター) 側; 両面/ユニバーサル; 共鳴面 (フロント) 側; その他
en: Head side: Batter (beater) side; Either/Universal; Resonant (front) side; Other
th: ด้านหัวกลอง: ด้านตี; ด้านใดก็ได้/อเนกประสงค์; ด้านสะท้อนเสียง (ด้านหน้า); อื่นๆ